Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.220

Local government accounting—Separate accounts for public service industries.

Separate accounts shall be kept for every public service industry of every local government, which shall show the true and entire cost of the ownership and operation thereof, the amount collected annually by general or special taxation for service rendered to the public, and the amount and character of the service rendered therefor, and the amount collected annually from private users for service rendered to them, and the amount and character of the service rendered therefor.

[ 1995 c 301 s 11; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.220. Prior: 1909 c 76 s 4; RRS s 9954.]